script/latin2syllabics.xfscript
! Script for latin to syll for Inuktitut

define Decapitalisation [ A -> a , 
                          B -> b ,
                          C -> c ,
                          D -> d ,
                          E -> e ,
                          F -> f ,
                          G -> g ,
                          H -> h ,
                          I -> i ,
                          J -> j ,
                          K -> k ,
                          L -> l ,
                          M -> m ,
                          N -> n ,
                          O -> o ,
                          P -> p ,
                          Q -> q ,
                          R -> r ,
                          S -> s ,
                          T -> t ,
                          U -> u ,
                          V -> v ,
                          W -> w ,
                          X -> x ,
                          Y -> y ,
                          Z -> z ]
                          ;




! 5-letter symbols

define nngiiRule [ n n g i i ] -> ᙱ  ; 
define nnguuRule [ n n g u u ] -> ᙳ  ; 
define nngaaRule [ n n g a a ] -> ᙵ  ; 
define ngaaiRule [ n g a a i ] -> ᙰ  ; 

define ngiiRule [ n g i i ] -> ᖏ  ; 
define nguuRule [ n g u u ] -> ᖑ  ; 
define ngaaRule [ n g a a ] -> ᖓ  ; 

define paaiRule [ p a a i ] -> ᐯ  ; 
define taaiRule [ t a a i ] -> ᑌ  ; 
define kaaiRule [ k a a i ] -> ᑫ  ; 
define gaaiRule [ g a a i ] -> ᒉ  ; 
define maaiRule [ m a a i ] -> ᒣ  ; 
define naaiRule [ n a a i ] -> ᓀ  ; 
define saaiRule [ s a a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define haaiRule [ h a a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define laaiRule [ l a a i ] -> ᓓ  ; 
define jaaiRule [ j a a i ] -> ᔦ  ; 
define vaaiRule [ v a a i ] -> ᕓ  ; 
define raaiRule [ r a a i ] -> ᕃ  ; 
define qaaiRule [ q a a i ] -> ᙯ  ; 

define nngiRule [ n n g i ] -> ᙱ  ; 
define nnguRule [ n n g u ] -> ᙳ  ; 
define nngaRule [ n n g a ] -> ᙵ  ; 

define ngaiRule [ n g a i ] -> ᙰ  ; 


! 3-letter symbols

define NNGRule [ n n g ] -> ᖖ ;

define piiRule [ p i i ] -> ᐲ  ; 
define puuRule [ p u u ] -> ᐴ  ; 
define paaRule [ p a a ] -> ᐹ  ; 

define tiiRule [ t i i ] -> ᑏ  ; 
define tuuRule [ t u u ] -> ᑑ  ; 
define taaRule [ t a a ] -> ᑖ  ; 

define kiiRule [ k i i ] -> ᑮ  ; 
define kuuRule [ k u u ] -> ᑰ  ; 
define kaaRule [ k a a ] -> ᑳ  ; 

define giiRule [ g i i ] -> ᒌ  ; 
define guuRule [ g u u ] -> ᒎ  ; 
define gaaRule [ g a a ] -> ᒑ  ; 

define miiRule [ m i i ] -> ᒦ  ; 
define muuRule [ m u u ] -> ᒨ  ; 
define maaRule [ m a a ] -> ᒫ  ; 

define niiRule [ n i i ] -> ᓃ  ; 
define nuuRule [ n u u ] -> ᓅ  ; 
define naaRule [ n a a ] -> ᓈ  ; 

define siiRule [ s i i ] -> ᓰ  ; 
define suuRule [ s u u ] -> ᓲ  ; 
define saaRule [ s a a ] -> ᓵ  ; 

define hiiRule [ h i i ] -> ᓰ  ; 
define huuRule [ h u u ] -> ᓲ  ; 
define haaRule [ h a a ] -> ᓵ  ; 

define liiRule [ l i i ] -> ᓖ  ; 
define luuRule [ l u u ] -> ᓘ  ; 
define laaRule [ l a a ] -> ᓛ  ; 

define jiiRule [ j i i ] -> ᔩ  ; 
define juuRule [ j u u ] -> ᔫ  ; 
define jaaRule [ j a a ] -> ᔮ  ; 

define viiRule [ v i i ] -> ᕖ  ; 
define vuuRule [ v u u ] -> ᕘ  ; 
define vaaRule [ v a a ] -> ᕚ  ; 

define riiRule [ r i i ] -> ᕇ  ; 
define ruuRule [ r u u ] -> ᕉ  ; 
define raaRule [ r a a ] -> ᕌ  ; 

define qiiRule [ q i i ] -> ᖀ  ; 
define quuRule [ q u u ] -> ᖂ  ; 
define qaaRule [ q a a ] -> ᖄ  ; 

define lhiiRule [ lh i i ] -> ᖡ  ; 
define lhuuRule [ lh u u ] -> ᖣ  ; 
define lhaaRule [ lh a a ] -> ᖥ  ; 

define aaiRule [ a a i ] -> ᐁ  ; 

define ngiRule [ n g i ] -> ᖏ  ; 
define nguRule [ n g u ] -> ᖑ  ; 
define ngaRule [ n g a ] -> ᖓ  ; 


define paiRule [ p a i ] -> ᐯ  ; 
define taiRule [ t a i ] -> ᑌ  ; 
define kaiRule [ k a i ] -> ᑫ  ; 
define gaiRule [ g a i ] -> ᒉ  ; 
define maiRule [ m a i ] -> ᒣ  ; 
define naiRule [ n a i ] -> ᓀ  ; 
define saiRule [ s a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define haiRule [ h a i ] -> ᓭ  ; 
define laiRule [ l a i ] -> ᓓ  ; 
define jaiRule [ j a i ] -> ᔦ  ; 
define vaiRule [ v a i ] -> ᕓ  ; 
define raiRule [ r a i ] -> ᕃ  ; 
define qaiRule [ q a i ] -> ᙯ  ; 


! Two letters

define iiRule [ i i ] -> ᐄ  ; 
define uuRule [ u u ] -> ᐆ  ; 
define aaRule [ a a ] -> ᐋ  ; 

define NGRule [ n g ] -> ᖕ ;
define piRule [ p i ] -> ᐱ  ; 
define puRule [ p u ] -> ᐳ  ; 
define paRule [ p a ] -> ᐸ  ; 

define tiRule [ t i ] -> ᑎ  ; 
define tuRule [ t u ] -> ᑐ  ; 
define taRule [ t a ] -> ᑕ  ; 

define kiRule [ k i ] -> ᑭ  ; 
define kuRule [ k u ] -> ᑯ  ; 
define kaRule [ k a ] -> ᑲ  ; 

define giRule [ g i ] -> ᒋ  ; 
define guRule [ g u ] -> ᒍ  ; 
define gaRule [ g a ] -> ᒐ  ; 

define miRule [ m i ] -> ᒥ  ; 
define muRule [ m u ] -> ᒧ  ; 
define maRule [ m a ] -> ᒪ  ; 

define niRule [ n i ] -> ᓂ  ; 
define nuRule [ n u ] -> ᓄ  ; 
define naRule [ n a ] -> ᓇ  ; 

define siRule [ s i ] -> ᓯ  ; 
define suRule [ s u ] -> ᓱ  ; 
define saRule [ s a ] -> ᓴ  ; 

define hiRule [ h i ] -> ᓯ  ; 
define huRule [ h u ] -> ᓱ  ; 
define haRule [ h a ] -> ᓴ  ; 

define liRule [ l i ] -> ᓕ  ; 
define luRule [ l u ] -> ᓗ  ; 
define laRule [ l a ] -> ᓚ  ; 

define jiRule [ j i ] -> ᔨ  ; 
define juRule [ j u ] -> ᔪ  ; 
define jaRule [ j a ] -> ᔭ  ; 

define viRule [ v i ] -> ᕕ  ; 
define vuRule [ v u ] -> ᕗ  ; 
define vaRule [ v a ] -> ᕙ  ; 

define riRule [ r i ] -> ᕆ  ; 
define ruRule [ r u ] -> ᕈ  ; 
define raRule [ r a ] -> ᕋ  ; 

define qiRule [ q i ] -> ᕿ  ; 
define quRule [ q u ] -> ᖁ  ; 
define qaRule [ q a ] -> ᖃ  ; 

define lhiRule [ lh i ] -> ᖠ  ; 
define lhuRule [ lh u ] -> ᖢ  ; 
define lhaRule [ lh a ] -> ᖤ  ; 

define aiRule [ a i ] -> ᐁ  ; 

define iRule [ i ] -> ᐃ  ; 
define uRule [ u ] -> ᐅ  ; 
define aRule [ a ] -> ᐊ  ; 

define pRule [ p ] -> ᑉ  ;
define tRule [ t ] -> ᑦ  ;
define kRule [ k ] -> ᒃ  ;
define gRule [ g ] -> ᖅ  ;
define mRule [ m ] -> ᒻ  ;
define nRule [ n ] -> ᓐ  ;

define hRule [ h ] -> ᕻ  ;
define lRule [ l ] -> ᓪ  ;
define vRule [ v ] -> ᕝ ;
define rRule [ r ] -> ᕐ ;
define QRule [ q ] -> ᖅ ;
define lhRule [ lh ] -> ᖦ ;


read regex [ Decapitalisation

.o. nngiiRule
.o. nnguuRule
.o. nngaaRule
.o. ngaaiRule

.o. ngiiRule
.o. nguuRule
.o. ngaaRule

.o. paaiRule
.o. taaiRule
.o. kaaiRule
.o. gaaiRule
.o. maaiRule
.o. naaiRule
.o. saaiRule
.o. haaiRule
.o. laaiRule
.o. jaaiRule
.o. vaaiRule
.o. raaiRule
.o. qaaiRule

.o. nngiRule
.o. nnguRule
.o. nngaRule

.o. ngaiRule



.o. NNGRule

.o. piiRule
.o. puuRule
.o. paaRule

.o. tiiRule
.o. tuuRule
.o. taaRule

.o. kiiRule
.o. kuuRule
.o. kaaRule

.o. giiRule
.o. guuRule
.o. gaaRule

.o. miiRule
.o. muuRule
.o. maaRule

.o. niiRule
.o. nuuRule
.o. naaRule

.o. siiRule
.o. suuRule
.o. saaRule

.o. hiiRule
.o. huuRule
.o. haaRule

.o. liiRule
.o. luuRule
.o. laaRule

.o. jiiRule
.o. juuRule
.o. jaaRule

.o. viiRule
.o. vuuRule
.o. vaaRule

.o. riiRule
.o. ruuRule
.o. raaRule

.o. qiiRule
.o. quuRule
.o. qaaRule

.o. lhiiRule
.o. lhuuRule
.o. lhaaRule

.o. aaiRule

.o. ngiRule
.o. nguRule
.o. ngaRule


.o. paiRule
.o. taiRule
.o. kaiRule
.o. gaiRule
.o. maiRule
.o. naiRule
.o. saiRule
.o. haiRule
.o. laiRule
.o. jaiRule
.o. vaiRule
.o. raiRule
.o. qaiRule


! Two

.o. iiRule
.o. uuRule
.o. aaRule

.o. NGRule
.o. piRule
.o. puRule
.o. paRule

.o. tiRule
.o. tuRule
.o. taRule

.o. kiRule
.o. kuRule
.o. kaRule

.o. giRule
.o. guRule
.o. gaRule

.o. miRule
.o. muRule
.o. maRule

.o. niRule
.o. nuRule
.o. naRule

.o. siRule
.o. suRule
.o. saRule

.o. hiRule
.o. huRule
.o. haRule

.o. liRule
.o. luRule
.o. laRule

.o. jiRule
.o. juRule
.o. jaRule

.o. viRule
.o. vuRule
.o. vaRule

.o. riRule
.o. ruRule
.o. raRule

.o. qiRule
.o. quRule
.o. qaRule

.o. lhiRule
.o. lhuRule
.o. lhaRule

.o. aiRule

.o. iRule
.o. uRule
.o. aRule

.o. pRule
.o. tRule
.o. kRule
.o. gRule
.o. mRule
.o. nRule

.o. hRule
.o. lRule
.o. vRule
.o. rRule
.o. QRule
.o. lhRule ] ;
